Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 5

Prisoner Rehabilitation Act of 1970

41-21-501. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Prisoner Rehabilitation Act of 1970.”

Acts 1970, ch. 471, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-1801.

Cross-References. Report of confinement of first offenders, § 41-21-106.

41-21-502. Part definitions.

As used in this part:

“First term inmate” means a state inmate without a prior record of thirty (30) days or more detention upon conviction for a felonious crime at a federal, state or local penal facility in the United States; and

“Second term inmate” means a state inmate with a prior record of thirty (30) days or more with one (1) previous conviction for a felonious crime at a federal, state or local penal facility in the United States.

Previous confinements for misdemeanors shall have no bearing on inmates' qualifications as first term inmates and second term inmates for the purposes of this chapter.

Acts 1970, ch. 471, § 2; 1972, ch. 538, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-1802.

Cross-References. Report of confinement of first offenders, § 41-21-106.

41-21-503. Division of rehabilitative services — Director.

There is created a division of rehabilitative services to be administered by a director acting under the supervision of the commissioner of correction.

The director of rehabilitative services shall be appointed by the commissioner with the approval of the governor and shall be qualified to carry out a comprehensive program of rehabilitative treatment for certain first term inmates and, within the discretion of the commissioner or the commissioner's designated representative, certain second term inmates.

Acts 1970, ch. 471, § 3; 1972, ch. 538, § 2; T.C.A., § 41-1803.

41-21-504. Duties of director.

The director of rehabilitative services, under the supervision and authority of the commissioner of correction, shall formulate an overall plan for the rehabilitation of first term inmates and second term inmates considered corrigible and shall coordinate individual rehabilitative programs conducted by a staff of counselors appointed to carry out the plan. The various methods of rehabilitation shall include, but not be limited to:

Proper classification of inmates as to attitude and morale;

Potentials and work skill improvements during periods of confinement;

Adequate work training and vocational-technical programs designed to improve employment potentials;

Moral upgrading programs;

Formal education classes;

Self-help courses;

Religious instruction;

Legal advice; and

Employment aid to include a work release program for certain first term inmates and second term inmates.

The director, with the approval of the commissioner, shall prepare and issue appropriate rules and regulations governing the rehabilitation program and shall coordinate all activities with wardens' offices to assure that prison security is not compromised by the program. The director shall maintain complete records and submit quarterly progress reports to the commissioner.

The director, under the supervision and authority of the commissioner, has the authority to establish special alternative incarceration sites for the domicile of first term inmates and second term inmates considered eligible for rehabilitative programs under this part.

Acts 1970, ch. 471, § 4; 1972, ch. 538, § 3; T.C.A., § 41-1804; Acts 1988, ch. 994, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

41-21-505. Selection of counselors.

The director of rehabilitative services, with the approval of the commissioner of correction, shall select a staff of counselors to take charge of the activities of corrigible first term inmates and second term inmates.

It is the duty of the counselors, among other requirements, to report to the director, who in turn shall report to the commissioner, and the counselors shall perform such other duties as prescribed in applicable rules and regulations promulgated by the director.

Acts 1970, ch. 471, § 5; 1972, ch. 538, § 4; T.C.A., § 41-1805.

41-21-506. Counselors — Qualifications.

Persons selected as counselors shall be between twenty-five (25) years and fifty (50) years of age at the time of employment, hold bachelor degrees or the equivalent in psychology, sociology or other related fields and be fitted physically, mentally and morally to assume the duties of the positions.

Counselors shall be selected because of strong qualifications as to character, ability and training, and primarily with regard to their capacity for influencing human behavior. They shall be persons likely to exercise firm and helpful influences on persons placed in their charge.

No person shall be selected for the position of counselor before completing the appropriate basic training at the Tennessee corrections institute as prescribed by the board of control of the institute. In addition, as a condition of employment, a person may be required to complete periodic refresher courses as may be prescribed by the board of control of the institute.

Acts 1970, ch. 471, § 6; 1975, ch. 211, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-1806.

41-21-507. Duties of counselors.

The duties of the counselors are to program, supervise and observe the activities of first term inmates and second term inmates assigned to their care.

Normal caseloads shall be limited to twenty-five (25) inmates per counselor. Larger caseloads shall be permitted at the discretion of the commissioner of correction when sufficient numbers of qualified counselors are not available to meet the assignment limitation.

Grievances of inmates shall be referred to the director of rehabilitative services for appropriate action.

Counselors may recommend the alteration of an individual program plan, request that the supervision of an assigned inmate be transferred to another counselor or request that an inmate be released from a particular program. Recommendations or requests shall require the approval of the director before becoming effective.

Acts 1970, ch. 471, § 7; 1972, ch. 538, § 5; T.C.A., § 41-1807.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Prisons and Prisoners, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

41-21-508. Compensation of director, counselors and staff members.

The director, counselors and other staff members assigned the division shall have their compensation, if any, set in accordance with appropriate statutes dealing with the compensation of state employees.

Acts 1970, ch. 471, § 8; T.C.A., § 41-1808.

41-21-509. Participation in educational programs for inmates.

The division has the authority to permit certain first term inmates and second term inmates to leave correctional institutions during the necessary hours to participate in educational classes and technical-vocational training within the state. The department of education shall develop suitable courses based on employment demands, and first term inmates and second term inmates who have demonstrated efforts at self improvement shall be encouraged to enroll in the training classes. Prospective employers also shall be encouraged to assist in the planning and supervision of various phases of job training programs.

The scholastic release plan for individual first term inmates and second term inmates shall be subject to constant review by the director and may be terminated at any time with or without notice to the inmate. Infractions of rules or abuse of privileges shall not be tolerated.

Acts 1970, ch. 471, § 9; 1972, ch. 538, § 6; T.C.A., § 41-1809.

Cross-References. Special school district of penal and reformatory institutions, § 4-6-143.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

41-21-510. Work release programs — Domicile of inmates.

The division also has the authority to permit certain first term inmates and second term inmates to leave correctional institutions during necessary and reasonable hours to engage in approved work, conduct their own businesses or practice legitimate self-employed occupations, provided places of employment are located in the state. Other first term inmates and second term inmates may be released during appropriate times to seek employment in the state during or following terms of imprisonment.

First term inmates and second term inmates assigned to work release programs may be domiciled in local or county detention facilities in any area of the state or at other supervised confinement facilities approved for the purpose by the department of correction; provided, that appropriate authorities of those facilities have agreed to board subject inmates in accordance with directives established by the division. Fees for boarding inmates shall be in accordance with mutual agreements between local and county authorities and the department, but in no case shall exceed a per prisoner rate of five dollars ($5.00) a day.

First term inmates and second term inmates assigned to work release programs may be domiciled in the special alternative incarceration sites established pursuant to this part. Every inmate domiciled at such site shall be liable for reasonable charges for board as fixed by the commissioner of correction.

First term inmates assigned to the work release programs may be domiciled in private treatment facilities accredited by the American Correction Association in any area of the state that meets the approval of the commissioner; provided, that the appropriate authorities of those facilities have agreed to board the inmates in accordance with the directives established by the division. Fees for boarding inmates shall be in accordance with written agreements between appropriate officials of the private treatment facilities and the department of correction, but in no case shall fees exceed a per inmate rate of sixteen dollars ($16.00) per day, exclusive of any additional fees that may be agreed upon by the inmate and the private treatment facilities.

Orders for work release programs may be rescinded or modified at any time with or without notice to concerned inmates. Infractions of rules or abuse of privileges shall not be tolerated.

Acts 1970, ch. 471, § 10; 1972, ch. 538, § 7; 1982, ch. 787, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-1810; Acts 1988, ch. 994, § 2.

Cross-References. Community work projects for probationers, title 41, ch. 9.

Roster of inmate release privileges, title 41, ch. 21, part 7.

41-21-511. Earnings of inmates deposited in trust accounts — Establishment and payment of daily room and board rate.

When inmates are employed for wages or salaries, the division shall collect or require inmates to turn over wages and salaries when received, and the director shall assure the moneys are deposited in trust accounts and that ledgers are maintained reflecting the status of individual accounts. Each inmate gainfully or self-employed shall be liable for reasonable charges for board as fixed by the commissioner of correction. If necessarily absent from correctional institutions at meal times, the inmate shall, at the inmate's own request, be furnished with adequate meals to carry to work and the inmate's account shall be charged for those meals. If an inmate defaults in the payment of board by neglecting to turn over wages or salary, the inmate's release privileges as provided by this chapter shall automatically be terminated.

Notwithstanding § 41-21-510 or any other law to the contrary, as a condition precedent to being placed on a work release program, an inmate placed on any work release program shall agree to pay to the appropriate governmental body a daily room and board rate per inmate in an amount not less than five dollars ($5.00) nor more than twelve dollars and fifty cents ($12.50) of the inmate's take-home pay as provided in this chapter.

In the case of a state inmate on a work release program in a state correctional institution or in a local or county detention facility or other supervised confinement facility, the commissioner shall annually establish a fee schedule for daily room and board for the inmate; provided, that the schedule of fees is within the limitations specified in subdivision (b)(1) and the inmate is permitted to retain not less than twenty-five percent (25%) of take-home pay as savings. The inmate shall pay to the state the amount specified in the fee schedule.

In the case of a county inmate in a local or county detention facility or other supervised confinement facility, an inmate placed on a work release program shall pay to the local or county government responsible for maintaining the inmate an amount not less than five dollars ($5.00) per day nor more than twelve dollars and fifty cents ($12.50) per day as provided in a fee schedule to be prepared annually by the commissioner in the same manner as the state schedule of the fees.

Inmates participating in educational programs authorized by § 41-21-509 on a full-time basis, at least twelve (12) quarter or semester hours each term, may participate in a part-time work release program. Inmates attending school full time and working part time, under thirty-two (32) hours a week, who earn less than one hundred dollars ($100) a week shall pay room and board charges totaling twenty-five percent (25%) of weekly net income. If the inmate earns more than one hundred dollars ($100) per week, room and board charges shall be deducted as in subsection (b).

Acts 1978, ch. 471, § 11; 1979, ch. 353, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-1811; Acts 1988, ch. 570, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

41-21-512. Distribution of inmate earnings.

After initial payment of board, the wages and salaries of employed inmates shall be disbursed for the following purposes in the order set forth:

Necessary travel expense to and from work and associated incidental expenses;

Support of dependents, if any, in amounts fixed by the division of rehabilitative services;

Payment of any outstanding court costs assessed inmates;

Payment in full or ratably of obligations acknowledged in writing by inmates; and

The balance, if any, to inmates upon discharge from confinement.

Acts 1970, ch. 471, § 13; T.C.A., § 41-1812.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

41-21-513. Funds — Handling and disposition.

Procedures for the handling of all funds as set forth in this part shall be subject to review and approval by the comptroller of the treasury and the commissioner of finance and administration.

Funds received by the state shall become departmental revenue and be earmarked for use by the division of rehabilitative services in allotments issued by the department of finance and administration.

Acts 1970, ch. 471, § 12; T.C.A., § 41-1813.

41-21-514. Failure to return as evidence of intent to escape.

In the event inmates participating in outside scholastic or work programs fail to return to correctional institutions within specified time limits, such failures shall constitute prima facie evidence of intent to escape, and offending inmates shall thereby be liable to those penalties that are imposed or shall hereafter be imposed under the general laws of the state for the crime of escape.

Acts 1970, ch. 471, § 14; T.C.A., § 41-1814.

Cross-References. Escape, § 39-16-605.

Warrant authorized to retake prisoner who has absconded while on work release program, § 41-1-117.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

41-21-515. Application of part.

This part applies to first term inmates and second term inmates hereafter sentenced to prisons or other correctional institutions in Tennessee after February 20, 1970, and those first term inmates and second term inmates serving sentences in the state as of February 20, 1970; provided, that subject inmates have been approved for participation in the program by the division of rehabilitative services.

Notwithstanding anything in this part to the contrary, the rehabilitative programs made available in this part to first term inmates and second term inmates shall also be available to any other inmates deemed suitable for the programs by the department of correction. References in this part to “first term inmates and second term inmates” and to “inmates” are deemed to include those other inmates.

Participants shall be carefully selected and sentencing courts shall be consulted before particular inmates are placed in outside scholastic or work programs.

Persons convicted of capital offenses shall only be eligible to take part in the outside programs twelve (12) months prior to their eligible parole date.

Acts 1970, ch. 471, § 15; 1972, ch. 538, § 8; 1974, ch. 511, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-1815; Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 5.

41-21-516. Cooperation of public officials and agencies.

All public officials in the state shall provide whatever aid necessary to the division of rehabilitative services and the department of correction in the accomplishment of the requirements set forth in this part. The commissioners of education, human resources, labor and workforce development and finance and administration shall assure that appropriate departmental staff members are familiar with this part and that full cooperation is afforded the department of correction in carrying out the spirit and intent of this part.

Acts 1970, ch. 471, § 16; T.C.A., § 41-1816; Acts 1999, ch. 520, § 39.